Idaho, session 2025, H0152.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-2604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2604. DUTIES OF DIVISION ADMINISTRATOR. (1) In administering the
laws regulating professions, trades, and occupations within the division
of occupational and professional licenses, and in addition to the authority


granted to the administrator by the laws and rules of the agencies and enti-
ties within the division, the administrator may:
(a) Revise the operating structure of the division as needed to provide
efficient and appropriate services to the various professions, trades,
occupations, and programs administered within the division;
(b) Conduct examinations to ascertain the qualifications and fitness
of applicants to exercise the profession, trade, or occupation for
which an examination is held;
(c) Pass upon the qualifications of applicants for reciprocal li-
censes, certificates, registrations, and authorities;
(d) Prescribe rules for a fair and impartial method of examination of
candidates to exercise the respective profession, trade, or occupa-
tion;
(e) Appoint hearing officers, administer oaths, take depositions of
witnesses within or without the state in the manner provided by the ad-
ministrative rules adopted by the division, issue subpoenas, compel the
attendance of witnesses, and assess costs and fees incurred in the in-
vestigation and prosecution or defense of any certificate holder, li-
censee, or registrant of the division, in accordance with the provi-
sions of section 12-117(5), Idaho Code, when applicable, the contested
case provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and the laws and
rules of the agencies within the division;
(f) Assess civil penalties as authorized for a violation of laws or
rules, provided that any such civil penalty collected for a violation
of laws or rules shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), unless
otherwise provided by statute or rule, and shall be deposited in the
occupational licenses fund;
(g) Implement processes and promulgate rules for the administration of
the chapters of those agencies assigned to the division, including but
not limited to:
(i) The application, issuance, renewal, cancellation, and rein-
statement of licenses, certificates, registrations, and permits,
together with assessment of all related fees;
(ii) The terms by which fees may be prorated, if any; and
(iii) A fee holiday for any specific board fee imposed in adminis-
trative rule; and
(iii) (iv) Procedures for the replacement of lost or destroyed li-
censes, certificates, or registrations;
(h) Employ individuals, make expenditures, enter into contracts, re-
quire reports, make investigations, travel, and take other actions
deemed necessary;
(i) Collect and pay such fees as are required for criminal background
checks of applicants, licensees, or registrants;
(j) Provide honoraria as set forth in section 59-509(p), Idaho Code;
(k) Require applications to be verified under oath;
(l) Require applicants to provide a clear and legible copy of a govern-
ment-issued photo identification;
(m) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, terminate an applica-
tion that has not had any activity within one (1) year, unless otherwise
specified in law or rule;


(n) Issue a license, certificate, permit, or authority only on behalf
of an agency that has administrative rules approved by the legislature;
(o) Implement application processes that provide for clear adminis-
tration of all licenses, registrations, permits, and certificates,
including their status and history;
(p) Establish advisory committees as needed to provide efficient and
appropriate services to the various professions, trades, occupations,
and programs administered within the division; and
(q) Require applicants to submit fingerprints in accordance with the
provisions of section 67-9411A, Idaho Code, to conduct criminal back-
ground checks, unless otherwise specified in law or rule.
(2) Notwithstanding any law governing any agency within the division,
each board or commission member shall hold office until a successor has been
duly appointed and qualified.
(3) The administrator shall administer the following provisions and
shall perform such additional duties as are imposed by law: chapter 41,
title 39, Idaho Code, relating to the Idaho building code; chapter 40, ti-
tle 39, Idaho Code, relating to manufactured homes; chapter 43, title 39,
Idaho Code, relating to modular buildings; chapter 21, title 44, Idaho Code,
relating to manufactured home dealer and installer licensing; chapter 25,
title 44, Idaho Code, relating to mobile home rehabilitation; chapter 10,
title 54, Idaho Code, relating to electrical contractors and journeymen;
chapter 19, title 54, Idaho Code, relating to public works contractors;
chapter 26, title 54, Idaho Code, relating to plumbing and plumbers; chapter
45, title 54, Idaho Code, relating to public works construction management
licensing; chapter 50, title 54, Idaho Code, relating to installation of
heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems; chapter 80, title 39,
Idaho Code, relating to uniform public school building safety; chapter 59,
title 33, Idaho Code, relating to Idaho school safety and security; chapter
86, title 39, Idaho Code, relating to elevator safety; and chapter 22, title
55, Idaho Code, relating to underground facilities damage prevention.
(4) For those agencies listed in subsection (3) of this section, the ad-
ministrator may, in addition to those powers listed in this chapter:
(a) Issue registrations, licenses, and certificates;
(b) Charge a fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for each examination
administered, unless a different fee is established in law or rule;
(c) Conduct hearings on proceedings to discipline, renew, or reinstate
licenses, certificates, or authorities of persons exercising the re-
spective profession, trade, or occupation;
(d) Revoke, suspend, refuse to renew, or take other disciplinary action
against such licenses, certifications, or authorities; and
(e) Assess civil penalties as authorized for a violation of law or rule.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-2608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2608. OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES FUND CREATED -- DISPOSITION OF FEES --
REPORTS. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the occupational
licenses fund. All fees and renewal fees received by the division of occu-
pational and professional licenses for licenses to engage in trades, busi-
nesses, occupations, or professions shall be deposited to the credit of the


occupational licenses fund. The administrator shall ensure that fees col-
lected by the division are not waived, prorated, transferred, or refunded
unless authorized by rule or law of the agency within the division.
(2) The division of occupational and professional licenses shall pre-
pare quarterly reports regarding the revenues and expenditures of each board
and commission. Such reports shall be submitted within fifteen (15) busi-
ness days after the end of each quarter to the budget and policy analysis di-
vision of the legislative services office, and a copy of each report pertain-
ing to a certain board or commission shall be submitted to that board or com-
mission.
(3) The division of occupational and professional licenses shall pre-
pare a year-end report regarding the cash balances of each board and commis-
sion. The format of the report and information contained therein shall be
determined by the legislative services office legislative audits and budget
and policy analysis divisions no later than August 1, 2025. The report shall
be submitted annually to the budget and policy analysis division of the leg-
islative services office no later than December 1. If the year-end cash bal-
ance of any board or commission fund detail exceeds one hundred fifty percent
(150%) of the five (5) year rolling average of expenditures, the division of
occupational and professional licenses shall present a plan in the annual
report to the legislature for reducing fund balances, including but not lim-
ited to fee reductions and holidays. If the year-end cash balance of any fund
detail drops below thirty percent (30%) of the five (5) year rolling aver-
age of expenditures, the division of occupational and professional licenses
shall present a plan to the legislature for rectifying the low fund balance.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-212, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-212. GENERAL FEES. The board, as prescribed by its rules, may
charge an amount not to exceed:
(1) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for examination.;
(2) Three hundred dollars ($300) for licensure application or license
renewal.;
(3) Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for any certificate, original or re-
placement, to be issued as herein provided. pursuant to this section;
(4) Fifty dollars ($50.00) for administrative services, including, but
not limited to, mailing lists and release of information to other boards for
purposes of licensure.;
(5) One hundred dollars ($100) Two hundred dollars ($200) for retired
or inactive status licenses.;
(6) Five hundred dollars ($500) for license reinstatement.;
(7) Three hundred dollars ($300) for late fees, including late filing
of the annual license renewal.;
(8) Three hundred dollars ($300) for late fees, including late filing
of the continuing professional education report.; and
(9) Two hundred dollars ($200) Four hundred dollars ($400) for firm
registration.
SECTION 4. That Section 54-416, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


54-416. BIENNIAL LICENSES -- FEES -- REVOCATION. (1) The commission
shall grant annual or biennial licenses in compliance with the rules pre-
scribed by the commission and upon payment of the fees, the amount of which
is to be determined by the commission upon application, prescribed to pro-
moters, managers, booking agents, matchmakers, ring officials, combatants
and corner persons; provided, that the provisions of this section shall not
apply to combatants or other persons who may participate in contests or exhi-
bitions which that are exempted from the provisions of this chapter pursuant
to section 54-406(3), Idaho Code.
(2) Any such license may be revoked by the commission for any cause
which it shall deem it deems sufficient.
(3) No person shall participate or serve in any of the above capacities
unless licensed as provided in this chapter.
(4) The ring officials for any contest shall be designated by the com-
mission from among the active pool of licensed or appointed ring officials.
(5) The ring officials for any exhibition shall be provided by the pro-
moter and licensed by the commission.
SECTION 5. That Section 54-707A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-707A. FEES. (1) The board shall establish by rule fees for licen-
sure under the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(a) Application fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250);
(b) Initial license fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250);
(c) Endorsement license fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars
($250);
(d) Annual rRenewal of license fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dol-
lars ($250) five hundred dollars ($500);
(e) Inactive license fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars
($150);
(f) Temporary permit fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars
($150);
(g) Intern permit fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150);
and
(h) Continuing education provider application fee not to exceed five
hundred dollars ($500); and
(i) Clinical nutrition certification fee not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars ($250).
(2) Fees charged pursuant to paragraphs (b), (c), (f), (g), and (i) of
subsection (1) of this section shall be in addition to the application fee.
(3) All fees received under the provisions of this chapter shall be non-
refundable and shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the
occupational license account licenses fund in the dedicated fund, and all
costs and expenses incurred by the board under the provisions of this chapter
shall be a charge against and paid from the account fund for such purposes,
and the funds collected hereunder pursuant to this section shall be immedi-
ately available for the administration of this chapter, the provisions of
any other law notwithstanding.


SECTION 6. That Section 54-712, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-712. DISCIPLINE BY THE BOARD -- GROUNDS. Any license or permit is-
sued under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to restriction,
suspension, revocation or other discipline pursuant to the provisions of
sections 54-707 and 54-713, Idaho Code, if the board finds that the licensee:
(1) Has been convicted, found guilty, or received a withheld judgment
or suspended sentence in this or any other state of a crime that is deemed
relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1), Idaho Code;
(2) Used false, fraudulent or forged statements or documents, diplo-
mas or credentials in connection with any licensing or other requirements of
this chapter or misrepresented or concealed a material fact in obtaining li-
censing, renewal or reinstatement;
(3) Practiced chiropractic under a false or assumed name in this or any
other state;
(4) Advertised the practice of chiropractic in a false, misleading or
deceptive manner;
(5) Knowingly aided or abetted any person to practice chiropractic who
is not authorized to practice chiropractic as provided in this chapter or
failed to adequately supervise auxiliary staff who have contact with pa-
tients which that creates or results in an unreasonable risk of harm to the
patient;
(6) Is unable to obtain or renew a license to practice chiropractic, or
whose license to practice chiropractic has been restricted, revoked or sus-
pended by any other state, territory or district of the United States or for-
eign jurisdiction; a certified copy of the order shall be conclusive evi-
dence of any restriction, revocation or suspension of a license;
(7) Failed to safeguard the confidentiality of chiropractic records or
other chiropractic information pertaining to identifiable clients, except
as required or authorized by law;
(8) Practiced chiropractic when a license pursuant to this chapter is
suspended, revoked, or inactive due to failure to renew the annual license
within the time and manner required by the board;
(9) Refused to divulge to the board, upon demand, the means, method, de-
vice or instrumentality used in the treatment of a disease, injury, ailment,
or infirmity;
(10) Has engaged in any conduct which that constitutes an abuse or ex-
ploitation of a patient arising out of the trust and confidence placed in the
licensee by the patient;
(11) Has committed any act which that constitutes a crime that is deemed
relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1), Idaho Code;
(12) Is unable to practice chiropractic with reasonable skill and
safety by reason of:
(a) Mental illness; or
(b) Physical illness, including, but not limited to, physical dete-
rioration which that adversely affects cognitive, motor or perceptive
skills; or


(c) Habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs defined in law as con-
trolled substances, alcohol, or any other substances which that impair
ability; or
(d) Having a communicable, contagious or infectious disease which that
endangers the health of patients;
(13) Has violated the standard of care or code of ethics as adopted by
the board or misrepresented or committed fraud in any aspect of the business
or practice of chiropractic;
(14) Promoted unnecessary or inefficacious treatment, procedures, de-
vices or services or practiced in an incompetent or negligent manner result-
ing in or creating an unreasonable risk of harm; or
(15) Has violated any provision of this act or any rule promulgated by
the board for the administration or enforcement of this act, interfered with
the board's conduct of investigations, hearings or any other matters relat-
ing to discipline, including, but not limited to, misrepresenting facts, at-
tempting to influence witnesses or failing to answer subpoenas, or otherwise
failed to cooperate with the board in the fulfillment of its duties.
SECTION 7. That Section 54-1115, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1115. LICENSE FEES. Any fee required pursuant to this chapter, in-
cluding fees for original licenses, examinations, annual renewals, and cer-
tificates, shall be set by board rule. All fees shall be paid to the division
of occupational and professional licenses.
SECTION 8. That Section 54-1604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1604. FUNCTIONS AND DUTIES OF BOARD -- FEE FOR LICENSE APPLICANTS
-- RULES. (1) It shall be the functions and duties of such board to:
(a) Develop, impose, and enforce standards consistent with this act
which shall be met by individuals in order to receive and retain a li-
cense as a nursing home administrator which standard shall be designed
to insure ensure that nursing home administrators will be individuals
who are of good character and are otherwise suitable, and who, by train-
ing or experience in the field of institutional administration, are
qualified to serve as nursing home administrators;
(b) Develop and apply appropriate techniques, including examinations
and investigations, for determining whether an individual meets such
standards;
(c) Issue licenses to individuals determined, after application of
such techniques, to meet such standards, and revoke or suspend licenses
previously issued by the board in any case where the individual holding
any such license is determined substantially to have failed to conform
to the requirements of such standards;
(d) Establish and carry out procedures designated designed to insure
ensure that individuals licensed as nursing home administrators will,
during any period that they serve as such, comply with the requirements
of such standards;


(e) Receive, investigate, and take appropriate action with respect to
any charge or complaint filed with the board charging that any individ-
ual licensed as a nursing home administrator has failed to comply with
the requirements of such standards;
(f) Conduct a continuing study and investigation of administrators
of nursing homes within the state with a view to the improvement of the
standards imposed for the licensing of such administrators and of pro-
cedures and methods for the enforcement of such standards with respect
to administrators of nursing homes who have been licensed as such;
(g) The fee to be paid for any application, license, renewal, permit,
or registration shall be set by board rule in an amount not to exceed two
hundred dollars ($200). The fee for renewal of a license shall not ex-
ceed four hundred dollars ($400).
(2) The board or any committee or member thereof or any hearing officer
designated by such board, acting in an official capacity, shall have powers
and duties as provided by law.
Such board shall not be bound by the strict rules of evidence in the con-
duct of its proceedings but any determinations made shall be founded upon on
sufficient legal evidence to sustain them.
(3) The board shall also have the authority to make rules not inconsis-
tent with law as may be necessary for the proper performance of its duties,
and to take such other actions as may be necessary to enable the state to meet
the requirements set forth in section 1908 of the "social security act," the
federal rules promulgated thereunder, and other pertinent federal require-
ments.
(4) The board shall have the authority to collect from the state associ-
ation representing nursing homes in Idaho an amount as is necessary to fully
reimburse the board for all expenses relating to prelitigation panels con-
ducted pursuant to chapter 23, title 6, Idaho Code. Funds collected by the
board pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the occupational
licenses fund.
SECTION 9. That Section 54-2407, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-2407. FEES -- PAYMENT OF COSTS AND EXPENSES. (1) The division of oc-
cupational and professional licenses shall collect a fee not to exceed one
hundred dollars ($100) for each application, each administration of an exam-
ination, each original license, and each annual a fee not to exceed two hun-
dred dollars ($200) for each biennial renewal of any license issued pursuant
to this chapter and shall deposit all fees in the state treasury in accor-
dance with section 67-2608, Idaho Code. The actual fees shall be set by board
rule. The division shall also collect a fee not greater than that charged by
the examination provider when an examination is required as a condition of
licensure. All required fees shall not be prorated and are nonrefundable.
(2) All fees received under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid
to the division of occupational and professional licenses and deposited in
the state treasury to the credit of the occupational licenses fund, and all
costs and expenses incurred under the provisions of this chapter shall be
charged against and paid from said fund.


SECTION 10. That Section 54-2408, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-2408. LICENSES -- RECORDS. (1) The division of occupational and
professional licenses shall, upon the approval of the board and subject to
the provisions of this chapter, register and issue licenses to persons who
have been approved by the board in accordance with this chapter. The li-
censes shall bear on their face the seal of the state and the signature of
the division administrator of the division of occupational and professional
licenses, and will be effective until the next birthday of the individual
being certified. Licenses so issued shall be renewed annually in accor-
dance with section 67-2614, Idaho Code. The provisions of sections 67-2609
through 67-2614, Idaho Code, shall apply to licenses issued pursuant to this
chapter.
(2) The board shall keep and the division shall maintain a record of
board proceedings and a register of all applications that show:
(a) The name, age, social security number and residency of each appli-
cant;
(b) The date of application;
(c) The place of business of such applicant;
(d) The educational and other qualifications of each applicant;
(e) Whether or not an examination was required;
(f) Whether the applicant was rejected;
(g) Whether a license was issued;
(h) The dates of the action by the board;
(i) Compliance with continuing education requirements; and
(j) Such other information as may be deemed necessary by the board.
SECTION 11. That Section 54-3209, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3209. FEES -- LICENSING -- DURATION OF LICENSES. Each person sub-
mitting an application for licensure to practice social work shall pay an
application fee, as determined by the rules of the board, which shall not
exceed three hundred dollars ($300) biennially and which shall include the
original license fee. Each person licensed to practice social work shall pay
a license renewal fee, not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) as deter-
mined by the rules of the board. All licenses issued under the provisions
of this chapter shall be subject to biennial renewal and shall expire unless
renewed in the manner prescribed by the board regarding applications for re-
newal, continuing education, and fees. Renewal shall be in accordance with
the requirements of section 67-2614, Idaho Code.
SECTION 12. That Section 54-3415, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3415. RENEWAL OR REINSTATEMENT OF LICENSE. All licenses issued un-
der the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to annual renewal and
shall expire unless renewed in the manner prescribed by the board regarding
applications for renewal, continuing education, and fees. License renewal
and reinstatement shall be in accordance with section 67-2614, Idaho Code.


SECTION 13. That Section 54-5505, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5505. LICENSURE -- PENALTY. (1) The board shall grant a license to
any person who submits a completed application, pays the required license
fee as established by the board, and meets the qualifications set forth in
section 54-5506, Idaho Code.
(2) All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall be for a term of
one (1) year two (2) years and shall expire on the birthday of the licensee,
unless renewed in the manner prescribed by rule and section 54-5510, Idaho
Code. Except as set forth in this chapter, rules governing procedures and
conditions for license renewal and reinstatement shall be in accordance with
section 67-2614, Idaho Code.
(3) It is a misdemeanor for any person to assume or use the title or des-
ignation "licensed midwife," "L.M." or any other title, designation, words,
letters, abbreviations, sign, card, or device to indicate to the public that
such person is licensed to practice midwifery pursuant to this chapter un-
less such person is so licensed. Any person who pleads guilty to or is found
guilty of a second or subsequent offense pursuant to this subsection shall be
guilty of a felony.
(4) Except as provided in section 54-5507, Idaho Code, it shall be a
misdemeanor for any person to engage in the practice of midwifery without a
license. Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a second or
subsequent offense pursuant to this subsection shall be guilty of a felony.
SECTION 14. That Section 54-5607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5607. BOARD POWERS. (1) The board shall have the following powers:
(a) To receive applications for licensure, determine the qualifica-
tions of persons applying for licensure, provide licenses to applicants
qualified under the provisions of this chapter and reinstate and deny
licenses;
(b) To establish by rule and collect fees as prescribed by this chapter;
(c) To maintain records necessary to carry out its duties under this
chapter;
(d) To pass upon the qualifications and fitness of applicants for li-
censes and to adopt rules requiring annual continuing education as a
condition for the renewal of licenses issued under this chapter;
(e) To prescribe by rule the minimum number of and qualifications for
continuing education units (CEUs) to be required of each genetic coun-
selor seeking to obtain or renew a license in the state of Idaho and for
the approval of continuing education courses;
(f) To examine for, deny, approve, issue, revoke and suspend licenses
pursuant to this chapter and to conduct investigations and hearings in
connection with such actions;
(g) Establish To establish requirements for reinstatement and renewal
of licenses;
(h) To adopt and revise such rules as may be necessary to carry into ef-
fect the provisions of this chapter in compliance with chapter 52, title
67, Idaho Code. The rules shall include, but shall not be limited to,


a code of ethics for genetic counselors and licensed genetic counselor
standards of practice;
(i) In any proceeding before the board authorized by this chapter, the
board or its designee may administer oaths or affirmations to witnesses
appearing before it; and
(j) To take such action as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of
this chapter and to regulate the practice of genetic counseling.
(2) In a final order, the board may impose a civil penalty not to exceed
one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation by a licensee of this chap-
ter or of rules adopted by the board.
(3) The board may authorize, by written agreement, the division of oc-
cupational and professional licenses as its agent to act in its interest and,
in its discretion, to contract with the division of occupational and profes-
sional licenses for those services deemed necessary for the proper adminis-
tration of this chapter.
(4) The assessment of costs and attorney's fees incurred in the inves-
tigation and prosecution or defense of a licensee under this chapter shall be
governed by the provisions of section 12-117(5), Idaho Code.
SECTION 15. That Section 54-5822, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5822. FEES. (1) Any fee required pursuant to this chapter, in-
cluding fees for original licenses, certificates, registrations, permits,
annual renewals, and licenses, certificates, and registrations by endorse-
ment, shall be set by board rule.
(2) All fees received by the board under the provisions of this chapter
shall be nonrefundable, except as provided by board rule, and shall be de-
posited in the state treasury to the credit of the occupational licenses fund
in the dedicated fund, and all costs and expenses incurred by the board un-
der the provisions of this chapter shall be a charge against and paid from the
fund for such purposes. The fees collected under this chapter shall be imme-
diately available for the administration of this chapter, the provisions of
any other law notwithstanding.
SECTION 16. That Section 36-2108, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-2108. APPLICATION FOR LICENSE -- CONTENTS -- FEE -- QUALIFICATIONS
-- TERM -- BOND. (a) Each applicant for an outfitter's or guide's license
shall make application for such license upon a form to be prescribed and fur-
nished by the board.
1. All applications for an outfitter's license shall be signed by the
applicant, under oath or affirmation that all information supplied by
him in the application form is true and correct as he verily believes and
shall be duly notarized. Such applications shall include, but are not
limited to, a worded description of the boundaries of the operating area
in which such activity will be conducted.
2. All applications for a guide's license shall be signed by the appli-
cant.


(b) Applications shall be made to and filed with the board and, unless
arrangements have been made otherwise with the board, accompanied by proof
of eligibility for a bond payable to the person or persons employing the li-
censee and in a form approved by the board in the sum of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) for outfitters, to be executed by a qualified surety, duly autho-
rized to do business in this state, conditioned that for the current license
year said applicant, his agents and employees, if said license is issued to
him, shall conduct his business as an outfitter without fraud or fraudulent
representation, and will faithfully perform his contracts with and duties to
his patrons; said bond shall be filed with the board before issuance of the
license as provided herein.
(c) The board, in its discretion, may make such additional investiga-
tion and inquiry relative to the applicant and his qualifications as it shall
deem advisable, provided that final decision by the board upon an applica-
tion submitted by an applicant who has held during the preceding license year
a license of the same kind for which application is made, and upon an applica-
tion submitted by an applicant not holding during the preceding license year
a license of the same kind or embracing the same activity(ies) or area for
which application is made, shall be made not later than the end of the license
year in which the board receives all materials required to be submitted in
order to complete a license application or ninety (90) days from the date the
board receives all such materials, whichever is later.
(d) The applicant shall pay license, penalty, amendment and applica-
tion fees to the board as hereinafter provided:
1. The license fee shall be paid prior to the issuance of a license.
2. The license fee shall be used for the investigation of applicants,
for enforcement of this chapter, and for the administration costs of the
board.
3. The license fee for outfitters shall be four hundred dollars ($400)
for online licensing and four hundred fifty dollars ($450) for offline
licensing; the license fee for a designated agent as defined in section
36-2102(b), Idaho Code, shall be one hundred forty dollars ($140) for
online licensing and one hundred sixty dollars ($160) for offline li-
censing; and the license fee for guides shall be one hundred five dol-
lars ($105) for online licensing and one hundred fifteen dollars ($115)
for offline licensing.
4. A penalty fee in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) may be
charged in addition to the regular outfitter's license fee for any such
renewal applicant whose application is not complete by the end of the
outfitter's license year; this does not apply to a new applicant for an
outfitter's license.
5. A two-hundred-dollar ($200) fee shall be charged for every amend-
ment to an outfitter's license other than a minor amendment, a
thirty-five-dollar ($35.00) fee shall be charged for every minor amend-
ment to an outfitter's license, and a twenty-dollar ($20.00) fee shall
be charged for every amendment to the license of a designated agent or
guide.
6. The following fees shall be established annually by the board and
shall be used for application related expenses: a one-time applica-
tion fee for outfitters not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400); a


one-time application fee for designated agents not to exceed fifty dol-
lars ($50.00); and a one-time application fee for guides not to exceed
twenty dollars ($20.00). The board shall establish by rule a policy
to refund unused application fees and shall establish by rule fees for
expedited, exceptional, resubmittal or emergency processing of license
applications, a fee credit for electronic filing of applications and a
fee for the use of credit cards corresponding to the cost to the agency
of processing the card use.
SECTION 17. That Section 36-2108, Idaho Code, as amended by Section 56,
Chapter 86, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
36-2108. APPLICATION FOR LICENSE -- CONTENTS -- FEE -- QUALIFICATIONS
-- TERM -- BOND. (a) Each applicant for an outfitter's, designated agent's,
or guide's license shall make application for such license for either one (1)
or two (2) years upon a form to be prescribed and furnished by the board.
1. All applications for an outfitter's license shall be signed by the
applicant, under oath or affirmation that all information supplied by
him in the application form is true and correct as he verily believes and
shall be duly notarized. Such applications shall include, but are not
limited to, a worded description of the boundaries of the operating area
in which such activity will be conducted.
2. All applications for a guide's license shall be signed by the appli-
cant.
(b) Applications shall be made to and filed with the board and, unless
arrangements have been made otherwise with the board, accompanied by proof
of eligibility for a bond payable to the person or persons employing the li-
censee and in a form approved by the board in the sum of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) for outfitters, to be executed by a qualified surety, duly autho-
rized to do business in this state, conditioned that for the current renewal
cycle said applicant, his agents and employees, if said license is issued to
him, shall conduct his business as an outfitter without fraud or fraudulent
representation, and will faithfully perform his contracts with and duties to
his patrons; said bond shall be filed with the board before issuance of the
license as provided herein.
(c) The board, in its discretion, may make such additional investiga-
tion and inquiry relative to the applicant and his qualifications as it shall
deem advisable, provided that final decision by the board upon an applica-
tion submitted by an applicant who has held during the preceding renewal cy-
cle a license of the same kind for which application is made, and upon an ap-
plication submitted by an applicant not holding during the preceding renewal
cycle a license of the same kind or embracing the same activities or area for
which application is made, shall be made not later than the end of the renewal
cycle in which the board receives all materials required to be submitted in
order to complete a license application or ninety (90) days from the date the
board receives all such materials, whichever is later.
(d) The applicant shall pay license, penalty, amendment and applica-
tion fees to the board as hereinafter provided:
1. The license fee shall be paid prior to the issuance of a license.


2. The license fee shall be used for the investigation of applicants,
for enforcement of this chapter, and for the administration costs of the
board.
3. The license fee for outfitters shall not exceed four hundred dollars
($400) for one (1) year or seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) for two
(2) years for online licensing and four hundred fifty dollars ($450) for
one (1) year or nine hundred dollars ($900) for two (2) years for offline
licensing. The license fee for a designated agent as defined in sec-
tion 36-2102(b), Idaho Code, shall not exceed one hundred forty dollars
($140) for one (1) year or two hundred sixty-five dollars ($265) for two
(2) years for online licensing and one hundred sixty dollars ($160) for
one (1) year or three hundred twenty dollars ($320) for two (2) years for
offline licensing. The license fee for guides shall not exceed one hun-
dred five dollars ($105) for one (1) year or two hundred dollars ($200)
for two (2) years for online licensing and one hundred fifteen dollars
($115) for one (1) year or two hundred thirty dollars ($230) for two (2)
years for offline licensing.
4. A penalty fee in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) may be
charged in addition to the regular outfitter's license fee for any such
renewal applicant whose application is not complete by the end of the
outfitter's renewal cycle; this does not apply to a new applicant for an
outfitter's license.
5. A two-hundred-dollar ($200) fee shall be charged for every amend-
ment to an outfitter's license other than a minor amendment, a
thirty-five-dollar ($35.00) fee shall be charged for every minor amend-
ment to an outfitter's license, and a twenty-dollar ($20.00) fee shall
be charged for every amendment to the license of a designated agent.
6. The following fees shall be established annually by the board and
shall be used for application related expenses: a one-time applica-
tion fee for outfitters not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400); a
one-time application fee for designated agents not to exceed fifty dol-
lars ($50.00); and a one-time application fee for guides not to exceed
twenty dollars ($20.00). The board shall establish by rule a policy
to refund unused application fees and shall establish by rule fees for
expedited, exceptional, resubmittal or emergency processing of license
applications, a fee credit for electronic filing of applications and a
fee for the use of credit cards corresponding to the cost to the agency
of processing the card use.
SECTION 18. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 16 of this act shall be in full force
and effect on and after July 1, 2025. Section 17 of this act shall be in full
force and effect on and after July 1, 2028.